Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.500

Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 31.

The powers granted by *this 1973 amendatory act are in addition to and not in limitation of the powers conferred upon a mutual savings bank by other provisions of law.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 31 s 8.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: For "this 1973 amendatory act," see note following RCW 32.20.480.